Utah statutes.
67-1a-10.   Commission on Civic and Character Education -- Membership --
Chair -- Expenses.
(1)  There is created within the lieutenant governor's office the Commission
on Civic and Character Education.
(2)  The commission consists of seven members appointed as follows:
(a)  the lieutenant governor, as chief election officer of the state, or a
designee;
(b)  one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of
the House;
(c)  one member of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate;
(d)  one member of the State Board of Education, appointed by the chair;
(e)  one member of the State Board of Regents, appointed by the chair;
(f)  one member of the public with expertise in the area of civic and
character education appointed by the other members of the commission to serve
for a two year term; and
(g)  one justice of the Supreme Court or one appellate court judge appointed
by the Supreme Court.
(3) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall serve as chairperson or if the
lieutenant governor is unable to serve, the commission shall annually elect a
chairperson from its membership.
(b)  The commission shall hold meetings as needed to carry out its duties.  A
meeting may be held on the call of the chair or a majority of the commission
members.
(c)  Three commission members are necessary to constitute a quorum at any
meeting and, if a quorum exists, the action of a majority of members present
shall be the action of the commission.
(4) (a)  An appointed commission member shall be appointed for a two-year term
or until their successors are appointed.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the appointed membership for any reason, the
replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5) (a)  Commission members who are not government employees may not receive
compensation or benefits for the services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties at rates
established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  A commission member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for
service to the commission.
(6)  The duties of the lieutenant governor's office shall include leadership
of the commission.
(7)  The funding of the commission shall be a separate line item to the
lieutenant governor's office in the annual appropriations act.
